Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Branch Budget Recommendations

48.100.
Submission of branch budget recommendations.

A branch budget recommendation shall be submitted to the General Assembly by the Governor for the executive branch, the Chief Justice for the judicial branch, and the Legislative Research Commission for the legislative branch. The budget recommendations shall be submitted to the General Assembly on or before the tenth legislative day of each even-numbered-year regular session, except in the year following the election of a new Governor when the budget recommendations shall be submitted not later than the fifteenth legislative day of an even-numbered-year regular session.

Budget recommendations shall be submitted on the first day of any extraordinary session called for the purpose of amending a branch budget bill.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 7, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2001, ch. 32, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 58, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/21/2001). This section was amended by 2001 Ky. Acts chs. 32 and 58, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Section 1 at 980.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Section 1 at 1634.

See Legislative Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Section 1 at 1763.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Section 1 at 2016.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Snyder and Irland, The Separation of Governmental Powers Under the Constitution of Kentucky: A Legal and Historical Analysis of L.R.C. v. Brown,
73 Ky. L.J. 165 (1984-85).

48.110.
Contents of branch budget recommendations.

Each branch budget recommendation shall contain a complete financial plan for the branch of government for each of the next two (2) fiscal years. Each branch budget recommendation shall include:

A budget message signed by:

The Governor for the executive branch;

The Chief Justice for the judicial branch; and

The co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission for the legislative branch;

Statements of income and receipts for the two (2) fiscal years last concluded, and the estimated income and receipts, for each budget unit of the branch of government for the current fiscal year and each of the next two (2) fiscal years.

The statements of income and estimated income shall be itemized by budget unit and fund, and shall show separately receipts from:

Current income;

Refunds and reimbursements of expenditures;

The sale of assets; and

Receipts on account of the income of prior years.

Existing sources of income and receipts shall be analyzed as to their equity, productivity and need for revision, and any proposed new sources of income or receipts shall be explained;

A statement of the surplus in any account and in any special fund of the branch of government. If a surplus exists in any account of the branch of government the statement shall show the excess of all current assets over all current liabilities as of the beginning of each of the two (2) fiscal years last concluded, and all changes in these accounts during each of such two (2) fiscal years;

A statement as of the close of the last completed fiscal year and as of the close of the current fiscal year showing, for each budget unit the total funded debt, the value of sinking fund assets, the net funded debt, the floating liabilities as of the end of the current fiscal year, and the total debt as of the close of the last completed fiscal year and as of the close of the current fiscal year;

Summary and detailed comparative statements of expenditures itemized by budget unit for each of the two (2) fiscal years last concluded and requests for appropriations by funds or accounts, the budget of the current year, and the recommendations for appropriations for each of the next two (2) fiscal years. Following the lists of actual and proposed expenditures of each budget unit there shall be a detailed explanation of the actual and proposed expenditures, to include activities, beneficiaries and expected results of the programs or services of the budget units;

A draft of the proposed branch budget bill containing:

Recommendations of the branch of government for appropriations for the next two (2) fiscal years, and drafts of such revenue and other acts as may be recommended for implementing the proposed financial plan;

Recommended appropriations for extraordinary expenses and capital outlays, which shall be itemized in the proposed branch budget bill for the branch by budget unit. The title of each budget unit shall be worded to limit each appropriation to the specific use or purpose intended;

A plan for the reduction of the branch budget if there is a revenue shortfall of five percent (5%) or less in the general fund or road fund. In recommending budget reductions, the Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission shall not recommend universal percentage reductions, but shall weigh the needs of all budget units and shall strive to protect the highest possible level of service in their respective branches. Services which are not essential to constitutional functions shall be subject to reduction. Transfer of funds may be authorized by the budget reduction plan;

A plan for the expenditure of a general fund or road fund surplus of up to two and one-half percent (2.5%).

The plan shall include provisions for the expenditure of a surplus, and may provide for additional moneys for nonrecurring expenditures for which an appropriation was not made in a branch budget bill, or for a program or service authorized by law for which an appropriation was not made, or which was not fully funded.

In lieu of recommending the appropriation of funds, the plan may instead recommend the retention of surplus funds in the surplus account of the general fund or road fund for investment until appropriated by the General Assembly;

A recommended state capital projects program and a recommended program for the purchase of major items of equipment.

The recommended capital construction program shall include:

A complete list and summary description of each specific capital construction project recommended for funding during the biennium; and

For each project:

The agency and purpose for which it will be used;

The justification for the project;

Its estimated completion date;

The total estimated cost of completing the project;

The estimated cost of the project during the biennium;

The recommended sources of funds for the entire project; and

The dollar amounts recommended for appropriation and the dollar amounts, listed by source, that are anticipated from every other source of funds for the biennium.

All information required by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph shall be included in each branch budget recommendation. Each branch budget bill shall contain only a complete list of the specific capital construction projects recommended for funding during the biennium and, for each project, the information specified in subparagraph 2.b.v., vi., and vii. of this paragraph.

A report which details the effect of recommended new debt on the debt position of the Commonwealth shall be submitted at the same time the recommended capital program is submitted. Information shall be presented separately, and in total, for the general fund, road fund, and any affected restricted fund account.

Information in the report shall include but not be limited to the following:

Debt service on existing appropriation-supported debt, as a percentage of anticipated total revenues;

Debt service on existing appropriation-supported debt, as a percentage of anticipated available revenues;

The sum of debt service on existing appropriation-supported debt and debt service on recommended new appropriation-supported debt, as a percentage of anticipated total revenues;

The sum of debt service on existing appropriation-supported debt and debt service on recommended new appropriation-supported debt, as a percentage of anticipated available revenues;

The sum of debt service on existing appropriation-supported debt and debt service on recommended new appropriation-supported debt, as a percentage of estimated state total personal income; and

The sum of existing appropriation-supported debt and recommended new appropriation-supported debt, as a percentage of estimated state total personal income.

The recommended program for the purchase of major items of equipment submitted by the head of each branch of government shall include:

A complete list and summary description of each specific major item of equipment recommended for purchase during the biennium; and

For each major item of equipment:

The agency and purpose for which it will be used;

The justification for the purchase;

The estimated cost of the item, including ancillary expenses and any expenses necessary to make the equipment functional and operational;

The recommended sources of funds; and

The dollar amounts recommended for appropriation and anticipated from every other source of funds for the purchase.

All information required by subparagraph 5. of this paragraph shall be included in the executive branch budget recommendation. The branch budget bill for the executive branch shall contain only a complete list of each specific item of major equipment recommended for purchase during the biennium and, for each item, the information specified in subparagraph 6.b.iii., iv., and v. of this paragraph;

The branch budget recommendation for the Transportation Cabinet shall include the following information:

A separate branch budget bill;

A recommended biennial highway construction plan, which shall be presented as a separate bill, and which shall include a list of individual transportation projects included in the last four (4) years of the six (6) year road plan, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the recommended biennial highway construction appropriation, which can be advanced if:

Additional funds are received; and

All projects included in the biennial highway construction plan have been advanced or completed to the extent possible; and

The six (6) year road plan. The Governor shall have ten (10) working days after submission of the branch budget recommendation and the recommended biennial highway construction plan to submit the six (6) year road plan. The six (6) year road plan shall be submitted in a form and format cooperatively developed by the Transportation Cabinet and the General Assembly and approved by the Legislative Research Commission; and

In the executive branch budget recommendation, as a separate section, an amount sufficient to meet unexpected contingencies or emergencies, including but not limited to natural or man-made disasters, civil disorders, court orders requiring or resulting in the expenditure of state funds, or other related causes.

The amount shall be based on the nature, type, and frequency of named categories of events which may, from past experience, be reasonably anticipated.

This portion of the budget recommendation shall detail similar incidents and the nature and amount of the expenditures for each during the ten (10) years immediately preceding.

The total amount of appropriations recommended from any fund shall not exceed the cash resources estimated to be available and to become available to meet expenditures under the appropriations;

A certificate of the branch of government as to the accuracy of the statements of financial condition, of income and receipts, and of expenditures; and.

Such other information as is deemed desirable, or is required by law or regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 8, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). The Reviser of Statutes has altered the numbering of subsection (6)(d), (e),and (g) of this statute from the way it appeared in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 78, sec. 3, under KRS 7.136(1)(c).

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IX at 1759.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Auditor of Public Accounts to examine estimates in budget report and certify results of examination and recommendations to General Assembly, KRS

43.050

.

48.111.
Governor to include in executive budget recommendation a recommended program for rental of space costing more than $200,000 annually — Restriction on certain leases — Exception.

The Governor shall include in the executive branch budget recommendation and in the draft branch budget bill for the executive branch submitted to each even-numbered-year regular session of the General Assembly pursuant to KRS

48.110

, for the biennium period beginning July 1, 1992, and for each biennium thereafter, a recommended program for rental of any space for which the annual rental cost will exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

The recommended program for leased space shall include:

A summary description of each specific two hundred thousand dollar ($200,000) lease project recommended for funding during the biennium; and

For each project:

The name of the agency for which space will be leased;

The purpose and justification for the lease;

Whether the lease contains a purchase option which will be exercised during the biennium pursuant to KRS 56.806(4) and the estimated purchase price;

Whether the lease contains a lease-purchase which will be completed during the biennium pursuant to KRS 56.806(5) prior to the total amortization, through lease payments, of the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease; and

The estimated sum of money that will have to be paid in addition to rent paid to complete the purchase;

The estimated cost of the lease; and

The recommended sources of funds.

All information required by subsection (2) of this section shall be included in the executive branch budget recommendation. The branch budget bill for the executive branch shall contain only the information specified in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of subsection (2)(b) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, no lease with an annual rental cost which will exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) shall be executed unless the lease has been identified and included in the branch budget bill. The branch budget bill for the executive branch shall authorize the expenditure by the budget unit that will occupy the premises.

A lease with an annual rental cost exceeding two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be authorized even though it is not specifically listed in the branch budget bill, subject to the following conditions and procedures:

A lease is awarded as the result of the consolidation of leases in which case, in addition to subsection (6) of this section, the provisions of KRS

56.803

and 56.823(2) or of KRS 56.805(2) and 56.823(3) shall apply, as appropriate; or

A lease is awarded as the result of an agency occupying substantially less space than it should, under the standards for space set by the Department for Facilities Management, in which case, in addition to subsection (6) of this section, the provisions of KRS

56.803

and 56.823(2) or of KRS 56.805(2) and 56.823(3) shall apply, as appropriate. The space allocated under the new lease shall not exceed the space which should be allocated pursuant to the standards for space; or

A lease with an annual rental cost of less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) is renewed or replaced for an annual rental cost that exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), but only if that request and subsequent renewal or replacement lease is:

From the same state agency lessee whose initial lease was under two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000);

For the same or substantially the same square footage as the initial lease that was under two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000);

The result of the competitive leasing process authorized by KRS 56.803;

For an annual lease payment of less than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); and

Effective only until June 30 of the next even-numbered year unless authorized in the branch budget bill; or

A lease is awarded as the result of an emergency in which case the provisions of KRS 56.805(3) and (4) and KRS 56.823(5) shall apply; or

Fifty percent (50%) or more of the actual cost shall be funded by federal or private funds; and

Money specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the lease. Money utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use of current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs; and

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall comply with the requirements of subsection (6) of this section.

No later than five (5) business days after an advertisement for lease proposals pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (5) of this section, the cabinet shall provide the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee with a copy of the advertisement and shall state in writing to the committee that the copy is being provided in compliance with this paragraph.

Prior to final authorization of a lease pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (5) of this section, the cabinet shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee:

The name of the agency for which space will be leased;

The purpose and justification for the lease;

The estimated cost of the lease;

The source of funds; and

Whether the requirements of paragraph (e) of subsection (5) of this section have been met.

Within thirty (30) days after the report required in paragraph (b) of this subsection has been submitted to the committee, the committee shall conduct its review and decide whether to approve or disapprove the proposed lease authorization. The Legislative Research Commission shall promptly transmit the committee’s findings and determinations to the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

If the committee disapproves a proposed lease authorization, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall:

Revise the proposed lease authorization to comply with the objection of the committee; or

Cancel the proposed lease authorization; or

Determine to proceed with the proposed lease authorization disapproved by the committee.

The decision made by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet under paragraph (d) of this subsection shall be communicated to the committee in writing within thirty (30) days of the committee’s disapproval.

The Legislative Research Commission shall maintain records of the committee’s disapproval of a proposed lease authorization and the cabinet’s report of its actions on a disapproved proposed lease authorization. If the committee disapproves a proposed lease authorization, the Legislative Research Commission shall transmit the committee’s disapproval and the cabinet’s action on the disapproval to the appropriate interim joint committee of the Legislative Research Commission and to the General Assembly when next convened in an even-numbered-year regular session.

If, after committee review, a lease is authorized, the lease shall be awarded pursuant to this section and KRS

43.050

and

56.800

to

56.823

and shall be subsequently reviewed pursuant to the appropriate subsection of KRS

56.823

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 177, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 387, § 24, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 539, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 58, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2009, ch. 78, § 43, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 73, § 8, effective June 8, 2011.

48.112.
Governor to include certain appropriations within budget recommendations for benefit reserve fund within Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission. [Repealed.]

48.115.
Planning report, preliminary revenue estimates, and official revenue estimates required by KRS 48.120 to be developed by consensus forecasting group — Revision of official revenue estimates — Threshold for implementation of enacted budge reduction plan.

The revenue estimates for the general fund and the road fund required by KRS

48.120

shall be based on a consensus revenue forecast. The planning report, preliminary revenue estimates, and official revenue estimates required by KRS

48.120

shall be developed by the consensus forecasting group. The members of the consensus forecasting group shall be jointly selected by the state budget director and the Legislative Research Commission. The members shall be knowledgeable about the state and national economy and the revenue and financial conditions of the Commonwealth.

If the Legislative Research Commission or state budget director determines that a revision to the official revenue estimates is needed, the Legislative Research Commission or state budget director shall request a revision from the consensus forecasting group. The revised revenue estimates shall become the official revenue estimates.

The enacted budget reduction plan required by KRS

48.130

shall be implemented only:

Upon the issuance of an official revenue estimate from the consensus forecasting group reflecting a revenue shortfall of five percent (5%) or less; or

At the end of a fiscal year, upon the existence of an actual revenue shortfall of five percent (5%) or less, as determined by the Office of State Budget Director.

The state budget director shall coordinate with the Department of Revenue and the Transportation Cabinet to ensure that the financial and revenue data required for the forecasting process is made available to the consensus forecasting group.

Staff for the consensus forecasting group shall be provided by the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 14, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 46, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 151, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 77, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 78, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

48.117.
Budget planning report. [Repealed.]

48.120.
Budget planning report and preliminary and official revenue estimates to be provided by Office of State Budget Director — Appropriations to be based on official revenue estimates.

By August 15 of each odd-numbered year, the Office of State Budget Director, in conjunction with the consensus forecasting group, shall provide to each branch of government a budget planning report. The budget planning report shall include:

A baseline analysis and projections of economic conditions and outlook;

Any potential consequences of the analysis and projections for the Commonwealth’s fiscal condition;

The revenue estimates and implications for the general fund and road fund for the current fiscal year and next four (4) fiscal years; and

Projections of personal income, employment, and economic indicators that reflect economic conditions.

By October 15 of each odd-numbered year, the Office of State Budget Director shall provide to each branch of government preliminary revenue estimates made by the consensus forecast group for the general fund and road fund for the current and next two (2) fiscal years, including explanatory statements, and a comparative record of the actual revenues of these funds for each of the last two (2) years concluded.

On or before the fifteenth legislative day, the Office of State Budget Director shall certify and present to the General Assembly the official revenue estimates made by the consensus forecasting group for the general fund and road fund for the current and next two (2) fiscal years.

Appropriations made in the branch budget bills enacted for each branch of government shall be based upon the official revenue estimates presented to the General Assembly by the Office of State Budget Director under subsection (3) of this section, as modified by the General Assembly.

The enacted estimates shall become the official revenue estimates of the Commonwealth upon the branch budget bills becoming law, and shall remain the official revenue estimates of the Commonwealth until revised by the consensus forecasting group as provided in KRS

48.115

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 12, effective July 1, 1983; 1988, ch. 273, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 507, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 14, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 46, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 5, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 30 at 1751.

48.130.
Budget reduction plan for revenue shortfall of five percent or less to be included in each enacted branch budget bill — Shortfalls over five percent require legislative action.

The General Assembly shall include in each enacted branch budget bill a budget reduction plan for a revenue shortfall in the general fund or road fund of five percent (5%) or less. The budget reduction plan shall direct how budget reductions shall be implemented if there is a revenue shortfall of five percent (5%) or less.

A lay-off of state employees in the executive branch under the budget reduction plan enacted by the General Assembly shall comply with the provisions of KRS

18A.1132

.

Any revenue shortfall in the general fund or road fund of greater than five percent (5%) shall require action by the General Assembly.

Upon the issuance of an official revenue estimate by the consensus forecasting group reflecting a revenue shortfall in the general fund or road fund, or upon the existence of an actual revenue shortfall in the general fund or road fund at the close of a fiscal year as determined by the Office of State Budget Director, the Office of State Budget Director shall notify all branches of government. If the revenue shortfall is five percent (5%) or less, the following actions shall be taken:

The unappropriated balance of funds in the surplus accounts of the general fund or road fund shall first be used to meet the shortfalls in those respective funds; and

If the amounts described in paragraph (a) of this subsection are insufficient to address the revenue shortfall, the enacted budget reduction plan included in each branch budget bill shall be implemented.

The budget reduction plan for each branch of government may provide that the annual increment granted state employees under KRS

18A.355

shall be reduced as provided by KRS

18A.355

. Any reduction of the annual increment shall be uniform for all employees.

No budget reduction action shall be taken by any branch head in excess of the actual or projected deficit.

If general fund or road fund tax receipts increase over the revenues estimated in the official revenue estimate that resulted in reductions, then services may be restored in the reverse order of the reduced services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 13, effective July 1, 1983; 1986, ch. 494, § 23, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 273, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 507, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 387, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 46, § 17, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 6, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. VI at 1757.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. VII at 1758.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. VIII at 1758.

48.140.
Surplus expenditure plan to be included in each enacted branch budget bill — Surplus in excess of two and one–half percent to accrue to surplus account.

The General Assembly shall include in each enacted branch budget bill a plan for the expenditure of a general fund or road fund surplus.

If there is a surplus, the Office of State Budget Director shall notify all branches of government.

Except as provided in KRS

48.705

, any surplus in the general or road fund in excess of two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the enacted estimates shall not be expended but shall accrue to the surplus account of the general fund or road fund for investment until appropriated by the General Assembly.

Unless required by the budget reduction provisions in a branch budget bill, no funds shall be transferred from one budget unit to another budget unit.

Surplus funds in any account, unless a statute requires otherwise, shall lapse to the surplus account of the general fund for investment until appropriated by the General Assembly.

Funds in the surplus account of the general fund may be used for current expenditures as authorized by the budget reduction provisions of a branch budget bill.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 14, effective July 1, 1983; 1988, ch. 273, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 507, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 1995 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 3, effective November 3, 1995; 2009, ch. 78, § 7, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. VII at 1758.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IX at 1759.

48.150.
Appropriations to address unexpected emergencies and contingencies.

As used in this section, “unexpected emergencies and contingencies” includes but is not limited to natural or man-made disasters, civil disorders, court orders requiring or resulting in the expenditure of state funds, or other related causes.

Any appropriations made in an enacted branch budget bill to address unexpected emergencies and contingencies:

Shall not be expended for contingencies relating to capital construction projects or major items of equipment as defined by KRS

45.770

; and

Shall not be expended unless appropriations made for the same or similar purposes have been exhausted.

Each branch of government shall report expenditures for unexpected emergencies and contingencies, whether paid from appropriated funds or as a necessary governmental expenditure, to the standing appropriations committees of the General Assembly or the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue as appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 15, effective July 1, 1983; 2009, ch. 78, § 8, effective June 25, 2009.

48.160.
State matching for federal funds.

Each branch, by budget unit, shall submit in its budget recommendation a request for funds reasonably necessary to match anticipated federal funds which may become available during the biennium. The amount of anticipated federal funds shall also be specified. These matching funds shall not be utilized for federal block grants as defined by the Federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35) and any subsequent amendments thereto, including federal block grants authorized after July 1, 1983, unless such block grant applications are in compliance with the applicable federal and state laws, as well as the standards and criteria prescribed in KRS

45.353

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 16, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 13, 1984.

48.165.
Restrictions as to “necessary government expense” or items without specified dollar amounts.

In the submission of a branch budget recommendation to the General Assembly no branch of government shall submit any item as a “necessary government expense” or submit any item without a dollar amount affixed thereto, unless the entire proceeds of a particular trust and agency or other designated fund or account are to be assigned to specific budget units. In the event that all proceeds from a particular fund or account are to be assigned to specific budget units, an estimate of the receipts of each budget unit for each year of the biennium shall be provided together with the receipts from the previous two (2) bienniums.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 17, effective July 1, 1983.

48.170.
Additional information.

In addition to the requirements set forth in this chapter, the appropriations committees of each house or the Legislative Research Commission, as appropriate, may require additional information and may prescribe the form in which such additional information shall be submitted as a part of, or in support of, a branch budget recommendation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 18, effective July 1, 1983.

48.180.
Financial information submitted as part of executive branch budget request.

In addition to the information required by KRS

48.110

, the Governor shall submit the following information as a separate part of the branch budget request for the executive branch of government:

Summary statements of the financial condition of the state, which shall include such detailed schedules of revenues and summary of expenditures by fund as specified by law in addition to those the Governor deems desirable; and summary statements of the estimated fund balances for the current fiscal year and each of the next two (2) fiscal years; and statement of the surplus account for the general fund and the road fund, for the budget reserve trust fund account, and for each special fund. Each surplus account shall show the excess of all current revenues over all current expenditures as of the beginning of each of the two (2) fiscal years last concluded, and all changes in each surplus account during each of such two (2) fiscal years.

A statement as of the close of the last completed fiscal year and as of the close of the current fiscal year, showing for the Commonwealth the total funded debt, the value of sinking fund assets, the net funded debt, the floating liabilities as of the close of the last completed fiscal year and the estimated floating liabilities as of the end of the current fiscal year, and the total debt as of the close of the last completed fiscal year and as of the close of the current fiscal year.

A summary statement for each major fund of the cash resources estimated to be available at the beginning of each of the next two (2) fiscal years, and the estimated cash receipts of the fiscal year.

Such other information as is deemed desirable or is required by law or regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 9, effective July 1, 1983; 1995 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 4, effective November 3, 1995.

48.185.
Area development fund recommendations.

The provisions of any other law notwithstanding, the Governor shall include in the budget recommendation for the executive branch and in the draft branch budget bill for the executive branch submitted to each even-numbered-year regular session of the General Assembly for the biennium period beginning July 1, 1980, and for each biennium thereafter, recommendations for appropriations from the general fund to be made by the General Assembly to the area development fund established by KRS Chapter 42.

The amount to be recommended for the appropriation to the area development fund shall be four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the severance tax estimate for each fiscal year of the biennium.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 11, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 2001, ch. 58, § 4, effective June 21, 2001.

48.190.
Capital construction and space rental recommendations. [Repealed.]

48.192.
Commonwealth postsecondary prepaid tuition trust fund recommendations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the report of the actuary submitted in an odd-numbered year pursuant to KRS 164A.704(7)(b) reflects that there will be a real liability expected to accrue during the upcoming biennium that cannot be met with existing resources of the Commonwealth postsecondary education prepaid tuition trust fund created pursuant to KRS

164A.701

, the Governor shall include in the budget recommendation for the executive branch and in the draft branch budget bill for the executive branch submitted to the General Assembly an appropriation to the board in an amount necessary to meet the real liability expected to accrue in each fiscal year of the biennium.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXXI, § 8, effective April 25, 2006.

48.195.
Financial information on salaries and on filing fees and costs to be submitted as part of the judicial branch budget recommendation — Treatment of salaries in judicial branch budget bill.

The General Assembly shall set the salaries of the justices and judges of the Court of Justice in the judicial branch budget bill. The Chief Justice shall include in the judicial branch budget recommendation the salaries of the justices and the judges. If the General Assembly concurs with the recommended judicial salaries contained in the judicial branch budget recommendation, then the judicial salaries shall be set in the judicial branch budget bill by incorporating by reference the judicial branch budget recommendation. If the General Assembly sets judicial salaries different from the judicial branch budget recommendation, then the General Assembly shall set forth the salaries of the justices and judges or the incremental changes in the judicial branch budget bill.

The Chief Justice shall include in the judicial branch budget recommendation:

The filing fees and costs, and any changes in the fees and costs, set under KRS

23A.200

or

24A.170

during the fiscal biennium immediately preceding the biennium for which the recommendation is submitted; and

A statement of whether, and to what extent, the Supreme Court intends to raise or anticipates raising the fees and costs set under KRS

23A.200

or

24A.170

during the biennium for which the recommendation is submitted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 134, § 1, effective April 1, 1994; 2011, ch. 73, § 9, effective June 8, 2011.